Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 15 Criminal Background Checks
21-15-110. Notice to employer.

If a state employee is determined to be an offender or perpetrator in a true, substantiated, or founded report of child maltreatment or adult abuse and the state employee is employed in a designated position, the investigating agency shall immediately notify the employer of that state employee.

The employer shall immediately discharge the employee.

Upon completion of a criminal history check on an applicant, the bureau shall issue a report to the state agency.

The state agency shall determine whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

If the state agency determines that an applicant is disqualified from employment, then the state agency shall deny employment to the applicant.

If a national criminal history check is required under this section, the criminal history check shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

Before making a temporary or permanent offer of employment, a state agency shall inform an applicant that:

Continued employment is contingent upon the results of a criminal history check; and

The applicant has the right to obtain a copy of his or her criminal history report from the bureau.

An expunged record of a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense listed in this subsection shall not be considered a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the offense. No person shall be eligible for employment with a state agency in a designated financial or information technology position if that person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of, any of the following offenses by any court in the State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or of any similar offense by a federal court unless the conviction was vacated, or reversed:

Robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-102;

Aggravated robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-103;

Soliciting money or property from incompetents, as prohibited in § 5-27-229;

Theft of property, as prohibited in § 5-36-103;

Theft by receiving, as prohibited in § 5-36-106;

Theft of property lost, mislaid, or delivered by mistake, as prohibited in § 5-36-105;

Theft of leased, rented, or entrusted personal property, as prohibited in § 5-36-115;

Shoplifting, as prohibited in § 5-36-116;

Embezzlement by officer or employee of certain institutions, as prohibited in § 5-36-118 [repealed];

Theft of public benefits, as prohibited in § 5-36-202;

Theft of wireless service, as prohibited in § 5-36-303;

Facilitating theft of wireless service by manufacture, distribution, or possession of devices for theft of wireless services, as prohibited in § 5-36-304;

Any offense involving theft detection devices, as prohibited in §§ 5-36-401 — 5-36-405;

Forgery, as prohibited in § 5-37-201;

Falsifying business records, as prohibited in § 5-37-202;

Defrauding secured creditors, as prohibited in § 5-37-203;

Fraud in insolvency, as prohibited in § 5-37-204;

Issuing a false financial statement, as prohibited in § 5-37-205;

Receiving deposits in a failing financial institution, as prohibited in § 5-37-206;

Fraudulent use of a credit card or debit card, as prohibited in § 5-37-207;

Criminal impersonation, as prohibited in § 5-37-208;

Criminal possession of a forgery device, as prohibited in § 5-37-209;

Obtaining signature by deception, as prohibited in § 5-37-210;

Defrauding judgment creditors, as prohibited in § 5-37-211;

Unlawfully using slugs, as prohibited in § 5-37-212;

Criminal simulation, as prohibited in § 5-37-213;

Use of false transcript, diploma, or grade report from postsecondary educational institution, as prohibited in § 5-37-225;

Financial identity fraud, as prohibited in § 5-37-227;

Any offense as prohibited in the Arkansas Hot Check Law, § 5-37-301 et seq.;

Theft of communication services, as prohibited in § 5-37-402;

Criminal mischief in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-38-203;

Residential or commercial burglary, as prohibited in § 5-39-201;

Breaking or entering, as prohibited in § 5-39-202;

Computer fraud, as prohibited in § 5-41-103;

Computer trespass, as prohibited in § 5-41-104;

Any offense involving computer crime, as prohibited in §§ 5-41-201 — 5-41-206;

Criminal use of property or laundering criminal proceeds, as prohibited in § 5-42-204;

Any offense involving corruption in public office, as prohibited in §§ 5-52-101 — 5-52-108;

Tampering with a public record, as prohibited in § 5-54-121;

Criminal acts constituting Medicaid fraud, as prohibited in § 5-55-111;

Any offense involving illegal food coupons, as prohibited in §§ 5-55-201 — 5-55-205;

Engaging in a continuing criminal gang, organization, or enterprise, as prohibited in § 5-74-104; or

Criminal attempt, criminal complicity, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy, as prohibited in §§ 5-3-201, 5-3-202, 5-3-301, and 5-3-401, to commit any of the offenses listed in this subsection.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (f)(29), substituted “as prohibited in” for “violating” and substituted “§5-37-301 et seq.” for “as prohibited in §§5-37-301 –5-37-307”.

The state agency shall:

Use the Online Criminal Background Check System to obtain the criminal history or forward the criminal history check form to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police; and

Pay any fee associated with the criminal history check on behalf of the employee.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the bureau shall conduct a state criminal history check and a national criminal history check on an employee upon receiving a criminal history check request from a state agency.

(1)Upon completion of a criminal history check on an employee, the bureau shall issue a report to the state agency.

If the state agency determines that an employee is disqualified from employment, then the state agency shall discharge the employee.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “criminal history check form to the” in (a)(3)(B)(i).

If a national criminal history check is required under this section, the criminal history check shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

A state agency shall inform all employees in designated financial or information technology positions that:

An expunged record of a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense listed in this subsection shall not be considered a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the offense. A state agency shall discharge from employment an employee in a designated financial or information technology position who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of, any of the following offenses by any court in the State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or of any similar offense by a federal court unless the conviction was vacated or reversed:

(1)The provisions of §§ 21-15-111 and 21-15-112 prohibiting the hiring of a person or requiring the discharge of a person in a designated financial or information technology position may be waived by the director of a state agency upon the request of:

A supervisor or other managerial employee in the state agency;

An affected applicant; or

An incumbent employee in the designated financial or information technology position who is subject to discharge.

A request for a waiver must be made within five (5) days of the receipt of the criminal background check.

If the crime is a misdemeanor and more than five (5) years have lapsed since the conviction, the state agency is not required to discharge an incumbent employee if a request for a waiver is timely made and if the waiver is ultimately granted.

If an incumbent employee was immediately discharged but was subsequently granted a waiver, the incumbent employee shall be immediately reinstated but is not entitled to retroactive relief, including back pay.

If the waiver is not granted and the waiver request was for an applicant, the state agency is prohibited from hiring the applicant in a designated financial or information technology position.

If the waiver is not granted and the waiver request was for an incumbent employee who was not immediately discharged, the state agency shall immediately discharge the incumbent employee.

(1)A waiver may be granted upon a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant or employee is rehabilitated such that the public interest is not threatened by the applicant's or employee's employment.

The age at which the crime or act was committed;

The circumstances surrounding the crime or act;

The length of time since the crime or act;

Subsequent work history;

Employment references;

Character references; and

Other evidence demonstrating the rehabilitation of the applicant or employee.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 995, § 8.

21-15-111. Hiring new employees into designated financial or information technology positions.

(1)(A)When a person applies for employment with a state agency in a designated financial or information technology position and if the state agency intends to make an offer of employment to the applicant, the applicant shall complete a criminal history check form and shall submit the form to the state agency as part of the application process.

Within five (5) days of the state agency's decision to make an offer of employment to the applicant, the state agency shall use the Online Criminal Background Check System to obtain the criminal history or forward the criminal history check form to the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police and request the bureau to review the database of criminal history.

Within three (3) days of the receipt of a request to review the database, the bureau shall notify the state agency if the database contains any criminal history record on the applicant.

If no criminal history record regarding the applicant is found in the database, then the state agency may make an offer of temporary employment to the applicant while the bureau completes a criminal history check and the state agency determines whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

(A)If a criminal history record regarding the applicant is found in the database, then the applicant is temporarily disqualified from employment until the state agency determines whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

If the state agency determines that the applicant is not disqualified, then the state agency may continue to temporarily employ the applicant while the bureau completes a criminal history check.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the bureau shall conduct a state criminal history check and a national criminal history check on an applicant upon receiving a criminal history check request from a state agency.

(A)If the state agency can verify that the applicant has been employed by a state agency in a designated financial or information technology position within sixty (60) days before the application or has lived continuously in the State of Arkansas for the past five (5) years, the bureau shall conduct only a state criminal history check on the applicant.

If the state agency can verify that the selected applicant currently works for a state agency in a designated position or a designated financial or information technology position and the state agency can provide verification that a criminal history check for that position has been completed in the last five (5) years, the state agency does not need to conduct another criminal history check on the employee until the criminal history check is five (5) years old.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1422, § 3; 2007, No. 991, § 7; 2015, No. 1151, § 3.

21-15-112. Incumbent employees in designated financial or information technology positions.

(1)State agencies shall ensure that all employees in designated financial or information technology positions apply for criminal history checks by December 1, 2005.

An incumbent employee in a designated financial or information technology position shall have a subsequent criminal background check within five (5) years of the initial criminal background check and every five (5) years thereafter.

(A)In accordance with subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, each employee of a state agency in a designated financial or information technology position shall complete a criminal history check form and shall submit the form to the state agency.

If the state agency can verify that the employee has been employed by a state agency in a designated financial or information technology position within sixty (60) days before applying for the criminal background check or has lived continuously in the State of Arkansas for the previous five (5) years, the bureau shall conduct only a state criminal history check on the applicant.

(A)The state agency shall determine whether the employee is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

Continued employment is contingent upon the results of a criminal history check; and

The employee has the right to obtain a copy of his or her criminal history report from the bureau.

Robbery, as prohibited in §5-12-102;

Aggravated robbery, as prohibited in §5-12-103;

Soliciting money or property from incompetents, as prohibited in §5-27-229;

Theft of property, as prohibited in §5-36-103;

Theft by receiving, as prohibited in §5-36-106;

Theft of property lost, mislaid, or delivered by mistake, as prohibited in §5-36-105;

Theft of leased, rented, or entrusted personal property, as prohibited in §5-36-115;

Shoplifting, as prohibited in §5-36-116;

Embezzlement by officer or employee of certain institutions, as prohibited in §5-36-118 [repealed];

Theft of public benefits, as prohibited in §5-36-202;

Theft of wireless service, as prohibited in §5-36-303;

Facilitating theft of wireless service by manufacture, distribution, or possession of devices for theft of wireless services, as prohibited in §5-36-304;

Any offense involving theft detection devices, as prohibited in §§5-36-401 —5-36-405;

Forgery, as prohibited in §5-37-201;

Falsifying business records, as prohibited in §5-37-202;

Defrauding secured creditors, as prohibited in §5-37-203;

Fraud in insolvency, as prohibited in §5-37-204;

Issuing a false financial statement, as prohibited in §5-37-205;

Receiving deposits in a failing financial institution, as prohibited in §5-37-206;

Fraudulent use of a credit card or debit card, as prohibited in §5-37-207;

Criminal impersonation, as prohibited in §5-37-208;

Criminal possession of a forgery device, as prohibited in §5-37-209;

Obtaining signature by deception, as prohibited in §5-37-210;

Defrauding judgment creditors, as prohibited in §5-37-211;

Unlawfully using slugs, as prohibited in §5-37-212;

Criminal simulation, as prohibited in §5-37-213;

Use of false transcript, diploma, or grade report from postsecondary educational institution, as prohibited in §5-37-225;

Financial identity fraud, as prohibited in §5-37-227;

Any offense violating the Arkansas Hot Check Law, as prohibited in §5-37-301 et seq.;

Theft of communication services, as prohibited in §5-37-402;

Criminal mischief in the first degree, as prohibited in §5-38-203;

Residential or commercial burglary, as prohibited in §5-39-201;

Breaking or entering, as prohibited in §5-39-202;

Computer fraud, as prohibited in §5-41-103;

Computer trespass, as prohibited in §5-41-104;

Any offense involving computer crime, as prohibited in §§5-41-201 —5-41-206;

Criminal use of property or laundering criminal proceeds, as prohibited in §5-42-204;

Any offense involving corruption in public office, as prohibited in §§5-52-101 —5-52-108;

Tampering with a public record, as prohibited in §5-54-121;

Criminal acts constituting Medicaid fraud, as prohibited in §5-55-111;

Any offense involving illegal food coupons, as prohibited in §§5-55-201 —5-55-205;

Engaging in a continuing criminal gang, organization, or enterprise, as prohibited in §5-74-104; or

Criminal attempt, criminal complicity, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy, as prohibited in §§5-3-201,5-3-202,5-3-301, and5-3-401, to commit any of the offenses listed in this subsection.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1422, § 3; 2007, No. 991, § 8; 2009, No. 252, § 5.

21-15-113. Waiver of exclusion or discharge requirement for persons in designated financial or information technology positions.

Evidence of rehabilitation may include:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1422, § 3; 2007, No. 827, § 183.